Hawaii statutes.
[§663-8.3] Loss or impairment of earning
capacity; damages. (a) In all tort cases where damages are awarded for
loss or impairment of earning capacity, the amount of probable future earnings
shall be determined by taking into account the effect of probable taxes.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed
to limit or restrict the use of other factors deemed appropriate by a court in
calculating damages awarded for loss or impairment of earning capacity. [L Sp
1986, c 2, §18]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next